Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1860.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 12 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a section to read:§ 6220. Remote work.A licensee shall MAY permit an individual employed by the licensee to work from a remote location if all of the following requirements are met:(1) The licensed activities are conducted under the supervision of the licensee.(2) The licensee has written policies and procedures for the supervision of employees working from the remote location.(3) Access to the licensee's platforms and customer <--1234567891011121314151617 information is conducted in accordance with the licensee's comprehensive written information security plan.(4) In-person consumer interaction does not occur at the remote location if the remote location is at the employee's personal residence.(5) The remote location is not advertised or represented to consumers as an operating location of the licensee or the licensee's employees who work at the location.(6) The remote location is not owned or controlled by the licensee. For purposes of this paragraph, a remote location is not owned or controlled by a licensee if the remote location is:(i) under the control of a subsidiary or affiliate of the licensee;(ii) primarily used by the subsidiary or affiliate; and(iii) only used by the licensee on an incidental basis for the convenience of consumers.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1860PN2522 - 2 - 12345678910111213141516171819